Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. Toll Bridges.

§ 65-23-1.
Authority to construct and operate.

Any municipality, state highway commission, or county, severally or acting with other authorized agencies in this or adjoining states, may acquire, own, operate, construct, or aid in the construction in whole or in part improving and extending, and maintain toll bridges or free bridges, including the approaches thereto, either within such political subdivision or within five miles adjacent to the territory over which such public agency or subdivision has jurisdiction, which bridges shall extend over any of the rivers and waters in or forming the boundary of this and other states.

HISTORY:
1942, § 8435; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-3.
Toll bridge revenue bonds.

In order to secure funds or a part of the funds for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, owning, operating, improving, extending, and maintaining toll bridges and approaches thereto, all public agencies named in Section 65-23-1 may issue negotiable toll bridge revenue bonds and sell such bonds to the United States government or any authorized agency thereof or other investor or investors. In the event of the issuance and sale of bonds authorized by this article by a public agency, such agency shall charge a reasonable toll for the use of any such toll bridge, the amount of which toll shall be sufficient to pay the reasonable cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating such bridge and to provide a sinking fund sufficient to amortize and repay any such loan, including interest and financing cost, on such terms and within such period of time as may be agreed upon between the borrower and purchaser of such revenue bonds. Such toll shall be used for no other purpose except for the necessary purpose of maintenance and repair of said bridge; and any public body which shall issue bonds under the provisions of this article is hereby authorized and required to fix a toll schedule, alter and change it, and make all necessary provisions for the payment of principal and interest on any such bonds by the fixing, collecting, segregating, and allocating of the tolls and other revenues received from the operation of such bridge or bridges. Such public agencies enumerated above may execute liens, in proper form, and pledge the revenue derived from the toll of such bridges or such bridge and approaches, or both, which are constructed or acquired with funds borrowed as above to the retirement of such bonds. No revenue bonds or no liens securing such bonds shall be repaid in whole or in part from any funds arising from taxation, nor shall any such bonds or liens given under authority of this article constitute a lien on any other property of such public agency, or a pledge of the credit of such agency, unless specifically so voted by a majority of the qualified electors participating in an election held according to law for the purpose of so authorizing. At such time when all moneys borrowed as aforesaid shall have been repaid, together with interest and charges thereon, no further toll shall be charged for the use of such bridges by the traveling public. Bonds shall have semiannual interest coupons attached; such bonds may be made negotiable, may bear interest not to exceed six and one-half percent (61/2%) per annum, may mature annually or semiannually, and may contain a clause giving to the issuing authority the right to redeem any part of said issue of bonds with or without premium, and if with premium then not to exceed two percent (2%). Such bonds may be sold at such time and in such manner as the issuing authority may determine upon. All of such bonds so issued shall mature not more than thirty years after the issuing date thereof. Such bonds shall be payable at such place or places as may be determined upon by the issuing authority, which place of payment shall appear in said bonds. Any provisions of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds or interest coupons issued pursuant to the authorities of this article shall possess all of the qualities of negotiable instruments. The bonds and interest coupons shall be executed in such manner and shall be substantially in the form prescribed in the authorizing ordinance. In case any of the officers whose signature or signatures appear on the bonds or interest coupons shall cease to be such officers before delivery of such bonds, such signatures or counter-signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as though they had remained in office until such delivery. Such bonds shall be sold in such manner and upon such terms as the governing body of the issuing authority or authorities shall determine; but in no event shall the interest cost to maturity exceed six and one-half percent (61/2%) per annum. If serial bonds, such bonds shall mature annually or semiannually, and the first maturity date thereof shall not be more than five years from the date of such bonds.

All bonds, maturing annually or semiannually, with all maturities not longer than twenty-five years, with not less than one-fiftieth of the total issue to mature each year during the first ten years of the life of said bonds, and not less than one-twenty-fifth of said total issue to mature annually during the succeeding ten year period of the life of said bonds, shall have the remainder to be divided into approximately equal payments, one payment to mature during each year, or each half year, for the remaining life of the bonds. The bonds and interest coupons shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal, and other taxation under the laws of the State of Mississippi; and the bridge and approaches shall likewise be exempt from all state, county, municipal, and other taxation under the laws of the State of Mississippi. No bonds issued pursuant to this article shall constitute an indebtedness of a municipality or county or taxing district within the meaning of any statute or charter restriction, limitation, or provision. It shall be plainly stated on the face of each such bond, in substance, that the same has been issued under the provisions of this article, that the taxing power of the municipality issuing the same is not pledged to the payment of such bond or interest thereon, and that such bond and interest thereon are payable solely from the revenues of the system to be acquired or improved, for which such bond is issued, unless, as heretofore set forth, a majority of the qualified electors participating in an election for the purpose of issuing such bonds shall have voted other funds toward payment of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8436; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-5.
Enforcement of payment of bonds.

The holders of any bond or interest coupon issued under the provisions of this article may by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings at law or in equity enforce or compel performance by the appropriate official or officials of a municipality or public body of any and all acts and duties to be performed by such public body under the provisions of this article and the ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds and interest coupons. If there be any default in the payment of the interest and principal of any of said bonds, any court having jurisdiction in the proper action may, upon petition of the holder of any such bond, appoint a receiver to administer and operate the bridge, with power to fix rates and collect charges sufficient to provide for the payment of all bonds outstanding to the payment of which the revenue of such bridge is pledged, to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such toll bridge, and to apply the revenues of such toll bridge in conformity with the provisions of this article and the ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8437; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-7.
Power additional to other laws.

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition to the powers conferred by any other law, general, special or local. This article, without reference to any other statute or to any charter, shall be deemed full authority to purchase, build, improve, own, and operate the revenue producing system by this article authorized; to fix, maintain, and collect toll rates for the facilities afforded by such toll bridge; and to issue and sell bonds by this article authorized; and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor, any provision of the laws of the state or any charter of any municipality to the contrary notwithstanding. Where no funds are pledged as security for bonds to be issued by the municipality or other political subdivision other than the revenues arising from the tolls of the bridge to be purchased, erected, or extended, bonds may be authorized and issued under this article by ordinance incorporating the terms and conditions of said bonds passed by the governing authority of such municipality, county, taxing district, or other political subdivision, which article, resolution, or ordinance shall be spread in full upon the minutes of such political subdivision. It shall not be necessary to submit same to an election of the qualified voters of such political subdivision unless moneys for the payment of such bonds or interest thereon or maintenance of such bridge, or construction thereof, shall be pledged from taxes or other funds other than the revenue alone arising from the tolls collected on such bridge. In such event the proposition for the pledging of such additional funds and the issuance of such bonds shall be submitted for the approval of same to the voters of the municipality or other political subdivision at a special election called therefor according to law, and after a majority of the qualified electors voting at said election have voted in favor of the proposed bond issue. Where bonds have been authorized under this article, it shall not be necessary to make publication of any ordinance, resolution, notice, or proceedings relating thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8438; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-9.
How municipality, etc., may come under article.

Any municipality or county or political subdivision desiring to come under this article, whether such municipality be a special charter municipality or not, may so do and may own, operate, and maintain such toll bridge wholly within the State of Mississippi or partly within the State of Mississippi and partly within any adjoining state, together with all approaches to and from said bridge. This article shall apply to special charter cities simply by resolution of the governing authority thereof, either through resolution or ordinance, and without amendment to the charter of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8439; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-11.
State Highway Commission may aid.

The Mississippi State Highway Commission may, when in its opinion the best interest of the state requires, contribute such an amount of the cost of the construction of such bridge or bridges as it may determine would be to the best interest of the State of Mississippi when such bridge forms a part of or a continuation of the state highway system, or is so connected with the state highway system through the streets of a municipality leading from the approaches of such bridge to the state highway system, and may incorporate any such toll bridge into the state highway system. Such State Highway Commission may, in whole or in part, maintain such bridge as a part of the state highway system, or may leave the maintenance of such bridge to the municipality or other political body acting jointly with such State Highway Commission in the financing and operation of such bridge. In event that the State Highway Commission shall contribute any sums of money towards the creation or acquisition of such bridge and the approaches thereto, said State Highway Commission may or may not, in its discretion, require the repayment of such funds through tolls collected, together with interest on such moneys so advanced or donated at a rate, to be determined by said State Highway Commission, not to exceed said amount of six and one-half percent (61/2%).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8440; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-13.
Purchase of land.

The public agencies herein named, either jointly or severally, may acquire by purchase, gift, donation, or by eminent domain all necessary land, rights of way, easements, and supplies for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, owning, operating, improving, extending, and maintaining toll bridges and approaches thereto, acquiring same in such necessary width and length as the governing authority of such political subdivision or subdivisions may determine will be necessary, right, and proper for such bridge purposes. Such public agencies are likewise granted such rights in any adjoining state, provided that such rights do not in anywise conflict with the laws of such adjoining state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8441; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-15.
Collection of tolls.

Nothing in this article shall authorize or permit the collection of tolls on any bridge heretofore made toll-free or on any existing bridge on which tolls are not at present collected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8442; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-17.
Political authority of adjoining state.

Any municipality, county, parish, highway commission, or other political authority in an adjoining state which has been properly authorized by the laws of that state and the United States may exercise in the State of Mississippi any and all the powers granted in this article to municipalities and other public bodies in Mississippi, subject to the conditions and requirements of this article. In event that the powers granted under this article are exercised solely by a municipality or county, then same shall be exercised by the governing authority of such municipality or county; and in the event that same are exercised jointly, then same shall be exercised jointly by the governing authorities of such political subdivisions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8443; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-19.
Federal aid.

Any municipality or public authority hereinabove set forth, either jointly or severally, may enter into contracts with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, under the provisions of the National Industrial Recovery Act and the regulations made in pursuance thereof, and under any further acts of Congress of the United States to encourage public works, for the sale of bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of this article, or for the acceptance of a grant to aid such municipality or other public authority to acquire, build, or improve any toll bridge, or to enter into contracts with any person or corporation, public or private, for the sale of such bonds. Such contracts may contain such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by and between the municipality, or other public authority, and the United States of America, any agency thereof, or any purchaser of such bonds. This and all other provisions of this article shall apply to code municipalities of the State of Mississippi or special charter cities of the State of Mississippi alike. In event of special charter cities of the State of Mississippi, no amendment to the charter of such municipality shall be necessary in order for such municipality to have advantage of this article, but such municipality shall have such advantage by simply spreading upon the minutes of its governing board of authority by resolution or ordinance the fact that same desires to come under the provisions of this article, in which event such municipality or any other political authority of the State of Mississippi hereinabove named shall have full power to adopt such ordinance and resolution and to do all things and perform all acts necessary or right or desirable to effectuate the full intent and purpose of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8444; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.

§ 65-23-21.
Article liberally construed.

This article, being necessary for and to secure the public health, safety, convenience, and welfare of municipalities, counties, and other political agencies of the State of Mississippi, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8446; Laws, 1935, ch. 44.